Tennessee, session 114, SB0917.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-50-119, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-50-121(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) "Speculative ticket":
(A) Means a ticket that is not in the actual or constructive possession of a
reseller at the time of sale, advertisement, or listing; and
(B) Includes a ticket sold by a reseller that, at the time of resale, is not:
(i) In the physical possession of the reseller;
(ii) Owned by the reseller; or
(iii) Under contract to be transferred to the reseller;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-50-121, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(e)
(1)
(A) A third-party ticket reseller shall not sell or offer to sell a
speculative ticket.
(B) A third-party ticket reseller that operates an internet website
or other electronic service that provides a mechanism for two (2) or more
SB0917
002791
- 1 -

parties to participate in a resale transaction shall not allow the sale or
offering for sale of a speculative ticket.
(2)
(A) The division of consumer affairs in the office of the attorney
general and reporter shall enforce this subsection (e). The division shall
establish a means by which a consumer may submit a complaint for a
violation of this subsection.
(B) If the division of consumer affairs finds that a third-party ticket
reseller violated subdivision (e)(1)(A) or (e)(1)(B), then the division must
assess a penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation. Each
instance of selling, offering for sale, or allowing the sale or offering for
sale of a speculative ticket is a separate violation.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to conduct occurring on or after that date.
- 2 - 002791